Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.095

Resource protection well operator's license.

A person shall be qualified to receive a resource protection well operator's license if the person:

(1) Has submitted a completed application to the department on forms provided by the department and has paid to the department the application fee required by rules adopted pursuant to this chapter;

(2) Has acquired field experience and educational training required by rules adopted pursuant to this chapter;

(3) Has passed a written examination as provided for in RCW 18.104.080. This requirement shall not apply to a person who passed the written examination to obtain a resource protection well construction operator's training license; and

(4) Has passed an on-site examination by the department if the person's qualifying field experience is from another state. The department may waive the on-site examination.

A person with a license issued pursuant to this chapter before July 1, 1993, may obtain a resource protection well construction operator's license by paying the application fee determined by rule adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter and submitting evidence required by the department to demonstrate that the person has the required experience to construct resource protection wells.

[ 1993 c 387 s 14.]